Utah statutes.
16-16-1301.   Derivative action.
A member may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited
cooperative association if:
(1)  the member demands that the association bring an action to enforce the
right; and
(2)  any of the following occur:
(a)  the association does not, not later than 90 days after the member makes
the demand, agree to bring the action;
(b)  the association notifies the member that it has rejected the demand;
(c)  irreparable harm to the association would result by waiting 90 days after
the member makes the demand; or
(d)  the association agrees to bring an action demanded and fails to bring the
action within a reasonable time.
